Idaho, session 2025, H0373.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Financial Management $21,100
from the General Fund to be expended for capital outlay for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Division of Financial Management is hereby re-
duced by $8,900 for operating expenditures from the General Fund for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.